trunk/incubator/da.newdic.dix
    <pardef n="ål__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ank/er__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rene</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ret</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ka/lv__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lven</l>
          <r>lv<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lve</l>
          <r>lv<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lv</l>
          <r>lv<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vlen</l>
          <r>lv<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/oder__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oderen</l>
          <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oder</l>
          <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ødrene</l>
          <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ødre</l>
          <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="æble__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="verb/um__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erne</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="øj/e__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nene</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="synops/is__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erne</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cyk/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>len</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lerne</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ler</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="salut__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ten</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>terne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ter</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="wc__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="risi/ko__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ciene</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>koen</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>koerne</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>koer</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ko</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/atter__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atteren</l>
          <r>atter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atter</l>
          <r>atter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øtrene</l>
          <r>atter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øtre</l>
          <r>atter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="drage__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="eng/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elen</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lene</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>len</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tog__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>(e)</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bid__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>den</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>derne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>der</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>det</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n/at__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ætterne</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ætter</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atten</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
